Georgia, session 2025_26, SB175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 2 of Title 21 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
general provisions regarding elections and primaries, is amended by adding a new Code
section to read as follows:
"21-2-20.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'ranked-choice voting' means a voting method
that allows electors to rank candidates for an office in order of preference and has ballots
cast be tabulated in multiple rounds following the elimination of a candidate until a single
candidate attains a majority.
(b) Ranked-choice voting shall not be used in determining the election or nomination of
any candidate to any local, state, or federal elective office.
S. B. 175
- 1 -

LC 56 0270
(c) This Code section shall not apply to electors who are entitled to vote absentee ballots
under the federal Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 52 U.S.C.
Section 20301, et seq., as amended."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 175
- 2 -